Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1544HV (2) 91 as/js H.F. 899 Section 1. Section 709.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. A person who is eighteen years of age 3 or older commits a serious misdemeanor if the person knowingly 4 sends a picture or video, which the person knows or reasonably 5 should know is unsolicited and unwanted by the recipient, by 6 electronic means depicting any of the following: 7 a. Any personâs genitals or pubic area. 8 b. Any person engaging in a sex act, as defined in section 9 702.17. 10 c. The covered genitals of a male person that are in a 11 discernibly turgid state. 12